Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.070

Claims on errors and omissions policies—Remedies.

(1) A person who claims to have sustained damages by reason of an unintentional error or omission of an exchange facilitator or an exchange facilitator's employee may file a claim on the errors and omissions insurance policy or approved alternative described in RCW 19.310.060 to recover the damages.

(2) The remedies provided under this section are cumulative and nonexclusive and do not affect any other remedy available at law.

[ 2009 c 70 s 8.]